Hawaii statutes.
[§673-3] Exhaustion of administrative
remedies. Before an action may be filed in circuit court under this
chapter, the party filing suit shall have exhausted all administrative remedies
available, and shall have given not less than sixty days written notice prior
to filing of the suit that unless appropriate remedial action is taken suit
shall be filed. All executive branch departments shall adopt in accordance
with chapter 91, such rules as may be necessary to specify the procedures for
exhausting any remedies available. [L 1988, c 395, pt of §2]

Law Journals and Reviews

The Native Hawaiian Trusts Judicial Relief Act: The First
Step in an Attempt to Provide Relief. 14 UH L. Rev. 889.

Case Notes

Where plaintiffs failed to comply with the sixty-day notice
requirement for filing suit under this section, this failure precluded the
supreme court from reviewing any claims brought under this chapter. 110 H.
338, 133 P.3d 767 (2006).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next